Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.310

Joint transportation committee—Allowances, expenses.

The members of the joint transportation committee will receive allowances while attending meetings of the committee or subcommittees and while engaged in other authorized business of the committees as provided in RCW 44.04.120. Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses incurred by the committee must be paid upon voucher forms as provided by the office of financial management and signed by the cochairs of the joint committee, or their authorized designees, and the authority of the chair or vice chair to sign vouchers continues until their successors are selected. Vouchers may be drawn upon funds appropriated for the expenses of the committee.

[ 2005 c 319 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.